Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-651.05
Public power districts; payment made in lieu of other taxes and fees; exceptions.

All payments made under sections 70-651.01 to 70-651.05 shall be in lieu of all other taxes, payments in lieu of taxes, franchise payments, occupation taxes, and excise taxes but shall not be in lieu of motor vehicle licenses and wheel taxes, permit fees, fuel taxes, and other such excise taxes or general sales taxes levied against the public generally.

Laws 1959, c. 317, § 5, p. 1164;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 37;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 16.